Wyoming statutes. Title 18 Counties
Chapter 7 Libraries

Cross references. —

For duty of county to provide and maintain necessary county buildings, see §

18-2-103

.

For authority of county libraries to issue certificates of indebtedness, see §

18-4-104

.

For authority of county commissioners to provide county law library, see §

5-3-111

.